Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1609
Manufacturer and distributor of liquefied petroleum gas equipment, defined.

Manufacturer and distributor of liquefied petroleum gas equipment means any person engaged in manufacturing, assembling, and marketing appliances, containers, and products used in the liquefied petroleum gas industry and any person in the wholesale marketing of appliances, containers, and products used in the liquefied petroleum gas industry.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 9.